Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 9. Community Corrections Alternative Program.

§ 53.1-67.9.
Establishment of community corrections alternative program; supervision upon completion.

The Department is authorized to establish and maintain a system of residential community corrections alternative facilities for probationers and parolees whose identified risks and needs cannot be addressed by conventional probation or parole supervision and who are committed to the Department under §

19.2-316.4

. The program shall include components for providing access to counseling, substance abuse testing and treatment, remedial education, and career and occupational assessment; providing assistance in securing and maintaining employment; ensuring compliance with terms and conditions of probation or parole; ensuring restitution and performance of community service; payment of fines, if any, and costs of court; and providing other programs that will assist the probationer or parolee in returning to society as a productive citizen. The Department shall perform risk and needs assessments to establish a case plan for each probationer or parolee determining the appropriate program components and program duration for that probationer or parolee.

Upon completion of the program, the probationer or parolee shall be released from confinement and remain on probation or parole for a period of one year or for such other longer period as may be specified by the sentencing court or Parole Board. As a condition of such probation or parole following the community corrections alternative component, a probationer’s or parolee’s successful participation in employment, career and technical education, or other educational or treatment programs may be required.

Probation officers assigned to the program shall be authorized by the judges of the circuit court of the county or city in which the position is assigned. Any officer so appointed shall have the same powers and duties as specified in §

53.1-145

, and such appointment shall be valid in any judicial circuit in the Commonwealth.

History.

2019, c. 618.